test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-ourw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - ouŗõ: # Verb 42 'eng /est karjuda/fin' - full paradigm
     ouŗõ+V+Inf: ouŗõ
     ouŗõ+V+Ger: ouŗõs
     ouŗõ+V+Sup: ouŗõm
     ouŗõ+V+Sup+Ine: ouŗõmõs
     ouŗõ+V+Sup+Ela: ouŗõmõst
     ouŗõ+V+Sup+Tra: ouŗõmõks
     ouŗõ+V+Sup+Abe: ouŗõmõt
     ouŗõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ōŗõb
     ouŗõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ouŗõt
     ouŗõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ouŗõbõd
     ouŗõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ōŗiz
     ouŗõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ōŗizt, ōŗiztõ]
     ouŗõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [ōŗizt, ōŗiztõ]
     ouŗõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ouŗ
     ouŗõ+V+Cond+Sg3: ouŗõks
     ouŗõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ouŗ
     ouŗõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ouŗ
     ouŗõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: ouŗõgid
     ouŗõ+V+Jus+Sg3: ouŗõg
     ouŗõ+V+Quo+Sg3: ouŗiji
     ouŗõ+V+ActPrfPrc: ouŗõn
     ouŗõ+V+PssPrfPrc: ouŗdõd
